District of Columbia statutes.
25-825

Revocation when retail licensee is subject to undue interest by wholesaler.

If a wholesaler of alcoholic beverages, whether licensed under this title or not, shall have such a substantial interest, whether direct or indirect, in the business of any retail licensee or in the premises on which the licensee’s business is conducted as may tend to influence the licensee to purchase beverages from the wholesaler, the Board may revoke the license of the licensee.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 331, ch. 4, § 19
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 903, ch. 756, § 16
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 11, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(7), 30 DCR 5927
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
1981 Ed., § 25-825.
1973 Ed., § 25-120.